Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1730.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4.1, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-837.02, to read: START_STATUTE41-837.02. Kachina Point Road A. Notwithstanding this article, Leupp Road is designated and shall be known as "Kachina Point Road". B. All official acts, state records, documents and papers relating to Leupp Road after the effective date of this section shall include the designation "Kachina Point Road".END_STATUTE